Washington statutes.
RCW 35.62.031

Ballot—One name proposed.

Where only one new name has been proposed by petition or resolution such question shall be in substantially the following form:

"Shall the name of the city (or town) of (insert name) be changed to the city (or town) of (insert the proposed new name) ?

Yes . . .

No . . ."

If a majority of the votes cast favor the name change, the city or town shall have its name changed effective thirty days after the certification of the election results.

[ 1990 c 193 s 2.]